Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
In General
§ 49-7-20.
Requirement of satisfactory completion of hunter education course; resident apprentice hunting license; resident combination small game hunting and fishing license.

It is unlawful for any person born on or after January 1, 1972, to procure any Mississippi hunting license, except a resident apprentice hunting license and a resident combination small game hunting and fishing license, unless the person has been issued certification of satisfactory completion of a hunter education course approved by the department.

It is unlawful for any person to issue any Mississippi hunting license, except a resident apprentice hunting license and resident combination small game hunting and fishing license, to any person born on or after January 1, 1972, unless the purchaser has provided valid certification of satisfactory completion of a hunter education course approved by the department.

It is unlawful for any person to fraudulently obtain a hunter education certification.

The department may revoke any hunting license or hunter education certification upon determination that the holder was not entitled to issuance or obtained the license or certification by any fraudulent means.

It is unlawful for any person born on or after January 1, 1972, to hunt with a resident combination small game hunting and fishing license, unless the person has been issued certification of satisfactory completion of a hunter education course approved by the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 445, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 409, § 5; Laws, 2006, ch. 486, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 501, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 49-7-20.1.
Child hunter safety; hunter education course; supervision by adult who holds valid Mississippi license for species being hunted.

To reduce hunting accidents of children under license age, to protect the safety of these children and to promote hunter safety, a child at least twelve (12) years of age and under sixteen (16) years of age must have a certificate of satisfactory completion of a hunter education course approved by the department before hunting in this state.

A child at least twelve (12) years of age and under sixteen (16) years of age may hunt without having the certificate of hunter education required under this subsection if the child is in the presence and under the direct supervision of a licensed or exempt hunter at least twenty-one (21) years of age when hunting.

A child under the age of twelve (12) must be in the presence and under the direct supervision of a licensed or exempt hunter at least twenty-one (21) years of age when the child is hunting.

A licensed hunter supervising a child as provided in this section must hold a valid Mississippi license for the species being hunted.

There is no penalty for a violation of this section, but to protect the safety of the child a conservation officer may require the child to end the hunt and may unload the firearm and may take the firearm and the child to an adult.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 405, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 484, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 49-7-21.
License certificates; hunting, trapping or fishing without license prohibited; penalties.

The licenses for hunting, trapping or fishing shall be issued on a form prepared by the executive director and supplied to the bonded agents authorized to issue licenses. The forms shall bear the name and social security number or driver’s license number of the applicant. All annual licenses shall be valid for one (1) year after the date of its issuance. The licenses shall be issued in the name of the commission and be countersigned by the bonded agent issuing same.

A person may purchase a license from the office of the department without appearing in person.

The commission may design, establish, and administer a program to provide for the purchase, by electronic means, of any license, permit, registration or reservation issued by the commission or department.

Any person authorized to issue licenses for hunting, trapping or fishing in this state who attempts to issue a license on a form other than one as prescribed by this section, or attempts to prepare a license certificate in any manner other than on the form prescribed by this section, and furnished by the executive director, is guilty of a Class II violation, and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the person convicted shall be forever barred from issuing licenses in the State of Mississippi.

Any resident or nonresident who hunts, takes or traps any wild animal, bird or fish must possess a valid license issued by the commission, unless specifically exempted under this chapter.

A resident who violates this subsection shall be fined Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). If at the hearing date or the date of payment of the fine the resident shows proof of the required Mississippi license, the fine shall be reduced to One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). If the resident shows proof that the required license was purchased before the date of the violation, the case shall be dismissed and all court costs shall be waived against the defendant.

In addition to the penalty imposed in paragraph (b), any resident who is not able to show proof of the required Mississippi license, shall be assessed by the court an administrative fee as prescribed under subsection (6) of this section.

Any nonresident, who hunts or traps without the required license is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined in an amount not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for the first offense and shall forfeit hunting and trapping privileges for a period of one (1) year. For the second offense a nonresident shall be fined in an amount of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both such fine and imprisonment and shall forfeit hunting and trapping privileges for a period of two (2) years. For any third or subsequent offense, a nonresident is guilty of a Class I violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-141, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The nonresident shall also be assessed by the court an administrative fee as prescribed under subsection (6) of this section.

Forfeiture of hunting, trapping and fishing privileges may be waived if, at the hearing date or the date of payment of the fine, the nonresident shows proof of the required nonresident hunting or trapping license.

Any nonresident who fishes without the required license is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined in an amount not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) for the first offense. For the second or any subsequent offense a nonresident shall be fined in an amount not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and that nonresident shall also be assessed by the court an administrative fee as prescribed under subsection (6) of this section.

In addition to any other fines or penalties imposed under subsection (4) or (5) of this section, the person convicted shall be assessed by the court an administrative fee equal in amount to the cost of the hunting, trapping or fishing license fee that such person unlawfully failed to possess at the time of the violation, the amount of which license fee shall be entered upon the ticket or citation by the charging officer at the time the ticket or citation is issued. The clerk of the court in which the conviction takes place, promptly shall collect all administrative fees imposed under this subsection and deposit them monthly with the State Treasurer, in the same manner and in accordance with the same procedure, as nearly as practicable, as required for the collection, receipt and deposit of state assessments under Section 99-19-73. However, all administrative fees collected under the provisions of this subsection shall be credited by the State Treasurer to the account of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, and may be expended by the department upon appropriation by the Legislature.

Any person who obtains a license under an assumed name or makes a materially false statement to obtain a license is guilty of a felony and shall be subject to a fine of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) or may be imprisoned for a term not to exceed one (1) year, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5877; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1938, ch. 178; Laws, 1952, ch. 191; Laws, 1974, ch. 569, § 18; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 9; Laws, 1980, ch. 471; Laws, 1981, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 9; Laws, 1990, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 629; Laws, 1995, ch. 580, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 472, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 329, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 49-7-22.
Multiyear licenses; fees; additional license fee for person issuing license.

The commission may authorize the issuance of a multiyear license not to exceed four (4) years of any license issued by the commission. The fee for a multiyear license shall be commensurate with the total of the annual fees for the annual license for the number of years of the multiyear license.

A person authorized to issue licenses by the department may collect and retain for issuing each license the fee authorized under Section 49-7-17.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 472, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 49-7-23.
Sale of hunting and fishing licenses by constables designated as deputy conservation officers.

The executive director may designate constables as deputy conservation officers, and constables so designated may be permitted to sell hunting and fishing licenses and may retain the fee provided in Section 49-7-17 for issuing each such license.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5857; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 221; Laws, 1974, ch. 569, § 19; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 10; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 11; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 63, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-25.
Records and reports.

Each officer authorized to issue licenses shall keep in a book to be supplied to him by the commission, a correct and complete list, in numerical order, of all licenses, resident or nonresident, issued by him. He shall enter at the close of each week the name and residence of each individual to whom a license was issued during that week, and shall on or before the tenth day of each month, forward to the executive director, on blanks furnished to him by the executive director, a complete list of all licenses so granted, with the name and address of each licensee, and shall pay over to the executive director all sums collected by him for licenses during the preceding month, and at the end of the license year shall render a final report and return to the executive director all license stubs and all unused or mutilated license blanks. Thereupon the executive director shall cause the account of the officer to be audited and a final statement furnished such officer on the condition of the account.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5880; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 64, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-26.
Development of tagging and reporting program for deer and turkey to collect harvest data and monitor bag limit compliance; penalties for violation of turkey or deer tagging program.

The department may develop, implement and regulate a tagging and reporting program to collect harvest data and monitor bag limit compliance by any means as provided in this section.

The department may charge a fee for the tagging program.

The department shall provide an annual report to the Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives.

The department may establish a tagging and reporting program for deer harvested by nonresidents.

A nonresident who violates any law or regulation of the nonresident deer tagging program shall be subject to the fine and forfeiture penalties provided for a nonresident hunting without a license under Section 49-7-21. In addition, a nonresident shall be assessed the administrative fee prescribed in this section.

The department may establish a tagging and reporting program for turkey.

A person who violates any law or regulation of the turkey tagging program is guilty of a Class III violation and shall be subject to the fines provided in 49-7-101. In addition, a person shall be assessed the administrative fee prescribed in this section.

A person convicted of a first violation of the tagging program shall be assessed an administrative fee of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), which shall be imposed and collected upon conviction. A person convicted of a second or subsequent violation shall be assessed an administrative fee of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), which shall be imposed and collected upon conviction.

The clerk of the court shall collect and deposit the administrative fees with the State Treasurer, in the same manner and in accordance with the same procedure, as nearly as practicable, as required for the collection and deposit of state assessments under Section 99-19-73.

The administrative fees shall be credited to the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and may be expended by the department upon appropriation by the Legislature.

Each deer or turkey taken or possessed in violation of the tagging program is a separate offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 510, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 49-7-27.
Revocation and suspension of licenses and privileges; penalties for hunting, trapping or fishing without license or privilege.

The commission may revoke any hunting, trapping, or fishing privileges, license or deny any person the right to secure such license if the person has been convicted of the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulation thereunder. The revocation of the privilege, license or refusal to grant license shall be for a period of one (1) year. However, before the revocation of the privilege or license shall become effective, the executive director shall send by registered mail notice to the person or licensee, who shall have the right to a hearing or representation before the commission at the next regular meeting or a special meeting. The notice shall set out fully the ground or complaint upon which revocation of, or refusal to grant, the privilege or license is sought.

Any person who is convicted for a second time during any period of twelve (12) consecutive months for violation of any of the laws with respect to game, fish or nongame fish or animals shall forfeit his privilege and any license or licenses issued to him by the commission and the commission shall not issue the person any license for a period of one (1) year from the date of forfeiture.

Failure of any person to surrender his license or licenses upon demand made by the commission or by its representatives at the direction of the commission shall be a misdemeanor and shall be punishable as such.

Any violator whose privilege or license has been revoked, who shall, during the period of revocation, be apprehended for hunting or fishing, shall have imposed upon him a mandatory jail term of not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months.

The commission is authorized to suspend any license issued to any person under this chapter for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be. If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control.

If a person is found guilty or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of Section 49-7-95, and then appeals, the commission shall suspend or revoke the hunting privileges of that person pending the determination of his appeal.

If a person does not comply with a summons or a citation or does not pay a fine, fee or assessment for violating a wildlife law or regulation, the commission shall revoke the fishing, hunting, or trapping privileges of that person. When a person does not comply or fails to pay, the clerk of the court shall notify the person in writing by first class mail that if the person does not comply or pay within ten (10) days from the date of mailing, the court will notify the commission and the commission will revoke the fishing, hunting or trapping privileges of that person. The cost of notice may be added to other court costs. If the person does not comply or pay as required, the court clerk shall immediately mail a copy of the court record and a copy of the notice to the commission. After receiving notice from the court, the commission shall revoke the fishing, hunting or trapping privileges of that person.

A person whose fishing, hunting or trapping privileges have been revoked under this subsection shall remain revoked until the person can show proof that all obligations of the court have been met.

A person shall pay a Twenty-five Dollar ($25.00) fee to have his privileges reinstated. The fee shall be paid to the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5881; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1964, ch. 229, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 408, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 507, § 10; Laws, 1998, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 388, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 354, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 49-7-29.
Wholesale minnow dealers.

This section shall be known as the “Mississippi Wholesale Minnow Dealers Law.”

Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

The term “wholesale minnow dealer” means any person selling minnows to a person for resale.

The term “person” means any person, firm or corporation.

The term “minnow” shall only mean golden shiner (Notemigonus crysoleucas), fathead minnow (Pimephales promelas), goldfish (Carassius auratus), common carp or Israeli carp (Cyprinus carpio), emerald shiner (Notropis atherinoides), western mosquitofish (Gambusia affinis), eastern mosquitofish (Gambusia holbrooki) and gulf killfish (Fundulus grandis).

The department shall license wholesale minnow dealers, as required under this section. However, bona fide residents of Mississippi growing minnows on their own property within the State of Mississippi shall be exempt from these license requirements.

It is unlawful for any person except those exempted by subsection (3) to sell minnows at wholesale within the State of Mississippi without a commercial fishing license.

A resident wholesale minnow dealer shall certify that he is a resident of the state and shall apply to the department for a commercial fishing license.

A nonresident wholesale minnow dealer shall apply to the department for a nonresident commercial fishing license. This nonresident license fee shall be set by the department.

Each sale of minnows in violation of this section shall be punishable as a Class I violation as provided in Section 49-7-141.

A copy of the commercial fishing license shall be carried at all times in each vehicle which transports minnows into or within the State of Mississippi. Each violation of this subsection shall be punishable as a Class I violation as provided in Section 49-7-141. However, no person charged with violating this subsection shall be convicted if he produces in court, or files with the clerk of the court before the date of appearance, proof that he held a valid commercial fishing license at the time that he was charged with a violation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5872.7; Laws, 1962, ch. 191, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 11; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 377, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 463, § 9; Laws, 2001, ch. 494, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 49-7-30.
Season for nongame gross fish.

The season for taking nongame gross fish by hand or rope shall be from May 1 to July 15.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 349, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 11, 2001.).

§ 49-7-31.
Open season on deer.

The open season on deer shall be as follows:

With bow and arrow: October 1 through the Friday prior to Thanksgiving.

With guns and with dogs: from the Saturday prior to Thanksgiving through December 1.

With primitive weapons and without dogs: December 2 through December 15.

With guns and without dogs: December 16 through December 23. However, the commission may allow hunting statewide or in specific areas with any legal weapon which it may designate without dogs after the end of the last season for hunting deer with guns and with dogs, but the season with legal designated weapons and without dogs shall not extend beyond January 31.

The commission shall establish an extended season with primitive weapons and bow and arrow without dogs from February 1 through February 15 for the area south of U.S. Highway 84 and east of Mississippi Highway 35 only for legal bucks. Any antlered deer taken in this area during any open season under this section must be a legal buck as defined in this paragraph. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “legal buck” means a deer with antlers of four (4) points or more with a minimum inside spread of ten (10) inches or a minimum main beam length of thirteen (13) inches. The commission may regulate the taking of deer with antlers of four (4) points or less under this paragraph for the proper management of antlered deer. The commission may delay the opening date and change the length of bow and arrow season in subsection (1)(a) in this area.

With guns and with dogs: December 24 through a date fixed by the commission that will provide a total of thirty-nine (39) days of hunting deer with guns and with dogs when added to the number of days provided for hunting deer with guns and with dogs in paragraph (b).

The commission may set and regulate the deer seasons on wildlife management areas which it administers.

The commission may allow the harvesting of antlerless deer in the districts or zones upon the recommendation of the executive director based upon good and substantial quantitative data and research evaluations that demonstrate that the harvesting is necessary to properly manage the herd.

The commission, only upon the recommendation of the executive director, may allow the harvesting of antlerless deer during the deer season with guns and with dogs by a majority vote of the commission.

Nothing in this subsection prohibits the harvesting of either-sex deer by landowners or leaseholders on private lands under the deer management assistance program prescribed or approved by the executive director.

The commission may provide a special permit for the harvesting of deer when they are depredating and destroying crops. The department shall supervise the harvesting and provide for the salvaging of the meat of the animals. The commission may authorize the department to assist any farmer in this state, who sustains crop damage by wildlife, in eradication of the problem wildlife.

During any open season on deer with primitive weapons after November 30, a person may use any legal weapon of choice on private lands only, if the person is:

The title owner of the land;

The lessee of the hunting rights on the land;

A member of a hunting club leasing the hunting rights on the land; or

A guest of a person specified in subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii).

If the person is required to have a hunting license, the person must have a primitive weapon license, Sportsman’s License or a Lifetime Sportsman’s License.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5882; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1934, ch. 285; Laws, 1936, ch. 221; Laws, 1938, ch. 365; Laws, 1940, ch. 220; Laws, 1944, ch. 234, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 6; Laws, 1960, ch. 162; Laws, 1962, ch. 192; Laws, 1964, ch. 230; Laws, 1968, ch. 259, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 286, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 305; Laws, 1981, ch. 475, § 2; Laws, 1981, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 9; Laws, 1983, ch. 301, § 1, ch. 527; Laws, 1990, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 555, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 633, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 592, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 486, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 521, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 312, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 548, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 373, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 529, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 439, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 49-7-31.1.
Open season on deer; requirements for wearing hunter orange during any firearm season; exceptions; penalties.

When hunting deer during any firearm season on deer, every hunter, whether hunting with a firearm, bow and arrow or any other weapon, must wear in full view at least five hundred (500) square inches of solid unbroken fluorescent orange, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Hunters shall not be required to wear the five hundred (500) square inches of solid unbroken fluorescent orange required under subsection (1) of this section when:

Hunting from a deer stand that is elevated twelve (12) feet or more above the ground; or

Hunting in a fully enclosed blind.

A violation of this section is a Class III violation and is punishable as provided in Section 49-7-101.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 529, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 310, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 49-7-31.2.
Open season for game birds.

The open season for game birds shall be as follows:

On bobwhite quail: The season shall open on Thanksgiving Day and run through the first Saturday in March next following.

On pheasant: There shall be no open season on pheasant.

On wild turkey: The commission may fix the spring season between March 1 and May 15. In addition, the commission may fix special fall either-sex seasons.

On migratory birds: The open season for migratory birds shall be the season prescribed by the Federal Migratory Bird Treaty regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 529, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 49-7-31.3.
Open season for game animals other than deer.

The open season on game animals except deer shall be as follows:

On squirrel: The season shall open on October 1 and run through February 28 next following. In addition, the commission is authorized to set a season that shall open not earlier than May 15 and run not later than June 1 next following.

On rabbits: The season shall open on the Saturday nearest October 15 and run through February 28 next following, and when rabbits are depredating or destroying crops, the owner of the crops or his tenants may shoot the rabbits with guns.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 529, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 388, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 49-7-31.4.
Open season on fur-bearing animals; hunting raccoons and bobcats with dogs; additional open season on raccoons.

The commission may fix the open season on fur-bearing animals between November 1 and March 15 next following and fix the open season for hunting opossums, raccoons and bobcats with dogs and guns by licensed hunters from October 1 to March 15 next following; but raccoons and bobcats may be run, hunted, chased or pursued throughout the year with dogs by licensed hunters.

The commission may establish an additional open season on raccoon from July 1 through October 1, and the bag limit on raccoon during the additional open season shall be one (1) per party, per night.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 529, § 6; Laws, 2014, ch. 391, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 49-7-31.5.
Hunting, trapping and taking of nuisance animals; unlawful to trap certain animals outside of open season for fur-bearing animals; hunting nuisance animals with dogs, electronic calls, bait and lures authorized; exceptions; hunting wild hogs; penalties.

The hunting, trapping and taking of nuisance animals shall be regulated by the commission. The commission may adopt regulations to regulate the hunting, trapping and taking of nuisance animals and to control the population of nuisance animals.

Landowners, agricultural leaseholders or their designated agents may take predatory and nuisance animals year-round on lands owned or leased by them.

Landowners, agricultural leaseholders or their designated agents may take nuisance animals with any type of weapon and may take nuisance animals during the night after legal hunting hours on lands owned or leased by them with a permit issued by the department.

No license is required for a resident landowner hunting or trapping nuisance animals on his own land. An agricultural leaseholder, designated agent and any other person must possess either an all-game hunting license or trapping license, unless otherwise exempt.

No license is required for a recipient of the Purple Heart Medal for wounds suffered in combat, to hunt nuisance animals on private lands. Persons exempt from purchasing a hunting license under this paragraph shall have in their possession and on their person a copy of their DD-214 discharge form indicating the receipt of the Purple Heart Medal and any proof as may be required by the commission or the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, while engaged in such activities.

The taking of any animal or animals other than nuisance animals by the use of a trap or traps is unlawful except during the time the season is open for the taking of fur-bearing animals.

Nuisance animals may be run, chased or pursued with dogs, except as provided in Section 49-7-32, year-round by licensed hunters.

Nuisance animals may be hunted with the aid of electronic calls.

Nuisance animals may be hunted or trapped with the aid of bait and lures, on private lands, according to regulations adopted by the commission.

Any part of a nuisance animal may be bought and sold year-round.

Wild hogs may not be caught or trapped and released into the wild at a location different from the location where the wild hog was caught or trapped.

A violation of this subsection is a Class I violation and is punishable as provided under Section 49-7-141.

When hunting wild hogs during any open gun season on deer, a hunter must wear in full view at least five hundred (500) square inches of solid unbroken fluorescent orange.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 529, § 7; Laws, 2006, ch. 522, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 499, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 308, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 434, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 49-7-32.
Restrictions on hunting with dogs during turkey season.

The commission may establish closed seasons on the running, hunting, chasing or pursuing with dogs of raccoon, fox or other wild animals or wild birds during turkey season in designated areas.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 327, § 2(1); Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 65, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-33.
Use of scents, lures, sound devices or supplemental feed for hunting and trapping.

It is unlawful to hunt, trap or kill any wild bird or wild animal of any kind with the aid of bait, recordings of bird or animal calls, or electrically amplified imitations of calls of any kind, except a person:

May use electrically amplified sound devices for hunting crow;

May use liquid scents for any animal or bird;

May use lures for trapping fur-bearing animals, according to regulations adopted by the commission;

May take nuisance animals as provided in Section 49-7-31.5; and

May take deer with the use of supplemental feed.

The commission, in its discretion, may relax the restrictions regarding the use of lures or sound devices if a condition arises or exists, as decided by the State Board of Health or county board of health, that may endanger persons or livestock in a certain community, county or area.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5897; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1942, ch. 253; Laws, 1944, ch. 234, § 7; Laws, 1971, ch. 322, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 417; Laws, 1996, ch. 486, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 523, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 499, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 600, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 365, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 49-7-33.1.
Taking deer with the use of supplemental feed.

The Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall allow the taking of deer with the use of supplemental feed and may place any reasonable conditions or restrictions on such taking.

The Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall establish a zone or zones of contiguous counties for the management and implementation of a program to allow the taking of deer with the use of supplemental feed.

The commission shall allow the taking of deer with the use of supplemental feed on private lands only.

The commission shall take any action it deems necessary and use its emergency powers to prevent the introduction of disease, to control disease, to eradicate disease, and to manage the taking of deer with the use of supplemental feed.

The Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall study and analyze all relevant data and issues with regard to the taking of deer with the supplemental feed program, including, but not limited to, the impact that the program has upon the health and density of deer populations and other wildlife, its effect on surrounding habitat, the effectiveness of wildlife law enforcement, the extent to which hunters who participate in the program are successful in harvesting deer and are supportive of the program, the perception of the program by the general public, and the extent to which the program has a favorable impact on economic development and tourism.

The department shall file annual progress reports with the Legislature. The department shall file a final report with recommendations on the feasibility of continuing the taking of deer with the use of supplemental feed.

A violation of this section or any regulation of the commission promulgated under this section shall be punishable as a Class II violation as defined in Section 49-7-143, and if the violator is a nonresident, then upon conviction, he or she shall lose the opportunity to obtain a nonresident license as defined in Section 49-7-8.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 600, § 3; Laws, 2010, ch. 365, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 49-7-34.
Hunting enclosures; permits; regulations; penalties for violation.

The Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall not prohibit the operation of a hunting enclosure for hunting or pursuing rabbit, fox or coyote, but the commission may prescribe regulations and require a permit for the operation of such hunting enclosures. Application for the permit shall be submitted to the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. The department shall inspect and approve such hunting enclosure before issuing a permit. The permit fee shall be a reasonable amount, to be determined by the commission.

Such hunting enclosure shall consist of an area fully enclosed by a fence. Such fence shall be constructed in such a manner as may be prescribed by the commission.

A person who violates this section or any regulation pertaining to hunting enclosures is guilty of a Class II violation and is punishable as provided in Section 49-7-143, Mississippi Code of 1972, and may, at the discretion of the commission, have his permit revoked for a period of twelve (12) months. A second or subsequent violation shall be punished by the maximum allowable fine as provided in Section 49-7-143.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 591, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 516, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 49-7-35.
Game season beginning on Sunday.

Whenever the time fixed by statute for the beginning of a game season shall fall on a Sunday, the season shall begin on the preceding Saturday.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5882.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 267, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 17, 1966).

§ 49-7-37.
Hunting of game with falcons or hawks, bow and arrow or primitive firearms; special open seasons on deer and small game; license fees; penalties.

Any resident of this state licensed to hunt or otherwise take any legal game bird or game animal in this state by or with the use of firearms, may hunt, kill, shoot or otherwise take game animals or game birds by the use of falcons or hawks as may be prescribed by the commission and in compliance with federal guidelines.

The commission may extend the special archery seasons on any public hunting projects, game refuges or prescribed areas having surplus deer populations.

The killing by primitive firearms of an antlerless deer or any other deer protected during the regular deer season is prohibited, but the commission may designate areas of the state in which the killing of antlerless deer may be permitted or limited.

The commission may make reasonable rules and regulations concerning the special seasons with falcons and hawks, bow and arrow and primitive firearms which it deems necessary and proper. The commission shall define the term “primitive firearm” for purposes of this section and other law or regulation.

The use of dogs shall be prohibited for hunting deer during any of the special hunting seasons.

In addition to a hunting license allowing the taking of deer, any resident desiring to hunt deer with bow and arrow or primitive firearm during primitive weapon or archery season or special hunts established by the commission shall purchase a special resident archery and/or primitive firearms license at a fee of Fourteen Dollars ($14.00) for each license plus the fee provided in Section 49-7-17.

Any person violating this section is guilty of a Class II violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143.

All seasons provided for herein shall begin on Saturday.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5872.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 173, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1962, ch. 190; Laws, 1968, ch. 259, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 454, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 478, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 468, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 12; Laws, 1982, ch. 435, § 9; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 10; Laws, 1988, ch. 435, § 12; Laws, 1989, ch. 377, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 463, § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 633, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 364, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 49-7-38.
Certain persons authorized to hunt with bow and arrow or crossbow during any open season on deer, turkey or small game.

Any person who is exempt from having a hunting license and any person licensed to hunt deer with a bow or primitive weapon may hunt with a crossbow or bow and arrow during any open season on deer, turkey or small game.

When hunting during any gun season on deer, the hunter must comply with Section 49-7-31.1.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 340; Laws, 1994, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 525, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 343, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.